Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
варити/Q
вдочерити/Q
веселити/Q
вивернути/P
виганяти/R
виглянути/P
виготовляти/R
видаляти/R
вид╕ляти/R
викурити/Q
викинути/P
викривляти/R
викрикнути/P
викрити/Q
вилаяти/R
виляти/R
вимерзнути/P
вим╕ряти/R
вимовляти/R
виправляти/R
випрямляти/R
виселяти/R
вислизнути/P
виснути/P
виставляти/R
висохнути/P
витягнути/P
визволяти/R
виявляти/R
вихваляти/R
вихолонути/P
в╕дварити/Q
в╕двернути/P
в╕дганяти/R
в╕дгризнути/P
в╕дгоряти/R
в╕ддаляти/R
в╕дд╕ляти/R
в╕дчиняти/R
в╕д╕гнути/P
в╕дкв╕тнути/P
в╕дкрити/Q
в╕дколупнути/P
в╕дм╕няти/R
в╕дм╕ряти/R
в╕дмовляти/R
в╕дновляти/R
в╕дправляти/R
в╕дринути/P
в╕др╕зняти/R
в╕дставляти/R
в╕дстебнути/P
в╕дтворити/Q
в╕дтанути/P
в╕дт╕няти/R
в╕дт╕сняти/R
в╕дтягнути/P
в╕дхиляти/R
в╕дбавляти/R
в╕рити/Q
в╕яти/R
вникнути/P
вправляти/R
всунути/P
вставляти/R
втихомирити/Q
вза╓мод╕яти/R
в'ялити/Q
в'янути/P
гавкнути/P
гамселити/Q
ганяти/R
гаснути/P
гульнути/P
гуляти/R
гинути/P
глянути/P
гнути/P
груб╕янити/Q
гримнути/P
говорити/Q
голити/Q
жалити/Q
дунути/P
дурманити/Q
д╕лити/Q
д╕яти/R
дряпнути/P
дзвонити/Q
дзявкнути/P
доварити/Q
дов╕рити/Q
дов╕ряти/R
доганяти/R
договорити/Q
докурити/Q
докинути/P
докорити/Q
докоряти/R
доробляти/R
доставляти/R
дострибнути/P
дотягнути/P
дозволяти/R
дошкуляти/R
щулити/Q
увергнути/P
уганяти/R
ударити/Q
ударяти/R
удобрити/Q
ущемляти/R
ущипнути/P
ущ╕льняти/R
учиняти/R
укрити/Q
улипнути/P
ул╕пляти/R
умовляти/R
уморити/Q
управляти/R
упокорити/Q
упорснути/P
уселяти/R
усиляти/R
усиновляти/R
усипляти/R
ускладнити/Q
ускладняти/R
уставляти/R
устромляти/R
утворити/Q
утиснути/P
утихомирити/Q
ут╕лити/Q
утрудняти/R
утягнути/P
уявити/Q
уявляти/R
уясняти/R
уштовхнути/P
убавляти/R
чахнути/P
чеканити/Q
черпнути/P
чинити/Q
ч╕пляти/R
чхнути/P
чорнити/Q
ц╕кавити/Q
ц╕лити/Q
ц╕нити/Q
цмокнути/P
╕скрити/Q
квакнути/P
каламбурити/Q
канути/P
кашлянути/P
кашляти/R
курити/Q
куховарити/Q
кивнути/P
киснути/P
кликнути/P
клюнути/P
креслити/Q
кружляти/R
крутнути/P
крякнути/P
ковзнути/P
колупнути/P
корити/Q
кор╕нити/Q
козирнути/P
козиряти/R
лаяти/R
лицем╕рити/Q
линяти/R
ляпнути/P
майнути/P
манити/Q
марити/Q
махнути/P
мерзнути/P
мудрити/Q
мусолити/Q
милити/Q
мимрити/Q
минути/P
мирити/Q
мислити/Q
м╕няти/R
м╕ряти/R
мовляти/R
моргнути/P
морити/Q
мозолити/Q
наварити/Q
навернути/P
нагрянути/P
наговорити/Q
нагострити/Q
над╕ляти/R
надпиляти/R
начиняти/R
нач╕пляти/R
накурити/Q
накинути/P
налаяти/R
намудрити/Q
намилити/Q
напудрити/Q
напнути/P
направляти/R
напоумляти/R
населяти/R
насунути/P
наставляти/R
настеляти/R
настр╕ляти/R
натворити/Q
натиснути/P
натякнути/P
наздоганяти/R
наштовхнути/P
нахиляти/R
нахмурити/Q
набавляти/R
набрякнути/P
наоб╕цяти/R
нишпорити/Q
палити/Q
парити/Q
партизанити/Q
паяти/R
пахнути/P
переварити/Q
перев╕рити/Q
перев╕ряти/R
переганяти/R
переглянути/P
переговорити/Q
перегорнути/P
передов╕ряти/R
перещеголяти/R
перекурити/Q
перекинути/P
перем╕ряти/R
перенаправляти/R
перепиляти/R
переплюнути/P
переправляти/R
перерити/Q
перерозпод╕ляти/R
переробляти/R
переселяти/R
переспорити/Q
переставляти/R
перестеляти/R
перестрибнути/P
перестр╕ляти/R
перетворити/Q
перетнути/P
перехитрити/Q
переоформляти/R
переодягнути/P
пудрити/Q
пиляти/R
пирхнути/P
п╕дганяти/R
п╕дглянути/P
п╕дкинути/P
п╕дкорити/Q
п╕дкоряти/R
п╕дм╕няти/R
п╕дмовляти/R
п╕дморгнути/P
п╕дпиляти/R
п╕дправляти/R
п╕дробляти/R
п╕дсунути/P
п╕дставляти/R
п╕дстьобнути/P
п╕дштовхнути/P
п╕дбадьорити/Q
п╕дбурити/Q
п╕нити/Q
плюнути/P
пред'являти/R
пружинити/Q
пригнути/P
приготовляти/R
прикурити/Q
прикрити/Q
прикр╕пляти/R
прилинути/P
примирити/Q
прим╕ряти/R
припиняти/R
присунути/P
прискорити/Q
приставляти/R
присягнути/P
притихнути/P
пришпорити/Q
провернути/P
пров╕трити/Q
проганяти/R
прочиняти/R
прокиснути/P
промайнути/P
пром╕няти/R
проникнути/P
пропиляти/R
просунути/P
просмикнути/P
проспорити/Q
проставляти/R
протухнути/P
протиставляти/R
протягнути/P
проштовхнути/P
п'янити/Q
повергнути/P
повиснути/P
пов╕домляти/R
пов╕рити/Q
повнити/Q
повторити/Q
поганити/Q
поганяти/R
поглинути/P
поговорити/Q
погострити/Q
подохнути/P
покурити/Q
покружляти/R
полонити/Q
померзнути/P
помирити/Q
пом╕ряти/R
порснути/P
поробляти/R
посварити/Q
постановляти/R
постарити/Q
посягнути/P
потьмарити/Q
потиснути/P
потонути/P
позаздрити/Q
поздоровляти/R
пошарити/Q
похитнути/P
поборознити/Q
пооб╕цяти/R
рвонути/P
ринути/P
рити/Q
рихлити/Q
рибалити/Q
розвернути/P
розвинути/P
розганяти/R
розжарити/Q
роздробляти/R
роздягнути/P
розчеп╕рити/Q
розч╕пляти/R
роз╕мкнути/P
розкупорити/Q
розкинути/P
розкрити/Q
розм╕няти/R
розм'якнути/P
розпиляти/R
розплеснути/P
розпрямляти/R
розрити/Q
розробляти/R
розтягнути/P
роззявляти/R
роз'ятрити/Q
розширити/Q
розбавляти/R
розбазарити/Q
розорити/Q
сваволити/Q
сварити/Q
свердлити/Q
свиснути/P
селити/Q
сунути/P
сигналити/Q
скалити/Q
скандалити/Q
скинути/P
скрикнути/P
скр╕пляти/R
слинити/Q
сл╕пнути/P
смолити/Q
спалахнути/P
спухнути/P
сплавляти/R
сплеснути/P
сплюнути/P
спричиняти/R
спорожняти/R
спотворити/Q
ср╕блити/Q
створити/Q
старити/Q
стьобнути/P
стусонути/P
стиснути/P
стрельнути/P
стрибнути/P
схуднути/P
схиляти/R
солити/Q
сохнути/P
творити/Q
танути/P
таранити/Q
тарабанити/Q
туманити/Q
тупнути/P
тиранити/Q
тиснути/P
т╕снити/Q
тралити/Q
труснути/P
тринькати/Q
тягнути/P
торкнути/P
зварити/Q
звикнути/P
зв╕рити/Q
зганяти/R
згинути/P
заварити/Q
зав╕рити/Q
зав'язнути/P
заганяти/R
загинути/P
загнути/P
заговорити/Q
загорнути/P
загострити/Q
зажарити/Q
задовольняти/R
задобрити/Q
защепнути/P
зачерпнути/P
зач╕пляти/R
закупорити/Q
закурити/Q
заклякнути/P
закрити/Q
закр╕пляти/R
замишляти/R
зам╕ряти/R
замкнути/P
заморити/Q
занурити/Q
запаяти/R
запахнути/P
запудрити/Q
зап╕дозрити/Q
запнути/P
заправляти/R
заселяти/R
заснути/P
застеляти/R
застигнути/P
затьмарити/Q
затуляти/R
затихнути/P
затягнути/P
заземляти/R
заштовхнути/P
забавляти/R
забороняти/R
здвинути/P
здохнути/P
здобрити/Q
зубоскалити/Q
зц╕ляти/R
з╕мкнути/P
з╕тхнути/P
злиняти/R
зморити/Q
зникнути/P
шепелявити/Q
шепнути/P
штукарити/Q
штрикнути/P
хвалити/Q
хилити/Q
хитнути/P
хмурити/Q
бадьорити/Q
бахнути/P
бурити/Q
бухнути/P
благословляти/R
бруднити/Q
бризнути/P
бомбити/Q
оглухнути/P
оговорити/Q
оформляти/R
одухотворяти/R
окликнути/P
округляти/R
ослабляти/R
охнути/P
обварити/Q
обганяти/R
обжарити/Q
обдурити/Q
об╕гнути/P
об╕цяти/R
обкурити/Q
облаяти/R
обминути/P
обмовляти/R
обставляти/R
обшпарити/Q
обороняти/R
